Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.225

Access to child's education and health care records.

(1) Each parent shall have full and equal access to the education and health care records of the child absent a court order to the contrary. Neither parent may veto the access requested by the other parent.

(2) Educational records are limited to academic, attendance, and disciplinary records of public and private schools in all grades kindergarten through twelve and any form of alternative school for all periods for which child support is paid or the child is the dependent in fact of the parent requesting access to the records.

(3) Educational records of postsecondary educational institutions are limited to enrollment and academic records necessary to determine, establish, or continue support ordered pursuant to RCW 26.19.090.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 28 s 3; 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 18; 1987 c 460 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 sp.s. c 28: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.

Effective dates—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.